Wisconsin, session 2025, AB360.
do enact as follows:AB360,11Section 1. 16.23 of the statutes is created to read:AB360,2,3216.23 Small law enforcement agency training pilot program. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:AB360,2,44(a) “Law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (c).AB360,2,85(b) “Law enforcement officer recruit” means a law enforcement officer or 6tribal law enforcement officer employed on a probationary or temporary basis in 7compliance with the minimum recruitment qualifications set by the law 8enforcement standards board under s. 165.85 (3) (b).AB360,2,139(c) “Preservice law enforcement officer student” means an individual who 10meets the minimum recruitment qualifications set by the law enforcement 11standards board under s. 165.85 (3) (b) and who enrolls in preparatory training 12under s. 165.85 (4) (a) 1. prior to employment as a law enforcement officer or tribal 13law enforcement officer.AB360,2,1614(d) “Small law enforcement agency” means any of the following that employs 1525 or fewer full-time equivalent law enforcement officers or tribal law enforcement 16officers who are not supervisors:AB360,2,17171. A police department.AB360,2,18182. A tribal police department.AB360,3,213. A combined protective services department under s. 60.553, 61.66, or 62.13 2(2e).AB360,3,334. A sheriff’s office.AB360,3,44(e) “Tribal law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (g).AB360,3,75(2) Administration. The department shall establish and administer a pilot 6program to provide training grants to small law enforcement agencies. The 7program shall provide for all of the following:AB360,3,98(a) The department shall maintain a list of small law enforcement agencies in 9this state and make the list available to law enforcement agencies in this state.AB360,3,1110(b) A small law enforcement agency may apply for a training grant, using a 11form created by the department, if any of the following criteria are met:AB360,3,14121. The agency has been notified that a law enforcement officer or tribal law 13enforcement officer it employs will, within 6 months, be retiring or leaving the 14agency.AB360,3,16152. The agency has a 20 percent or higher vacancy rate in its authorized law 16enforcement officer or tribal law enforcement officer positions.AB360,3,1817(c) A small law enforcement agency shall use a grant awarded under the 18program to pay costs only for the following training:AB360,3,21191. Preparatory training under s. 165.85 (4) (a) 1. for a preservice law 20enforcement officer student who will be employed by the small law enforcement 21agency after completion of the training.AB360,3,24222. Compensation and other employment costs for up to 6 months of on-the-job 23training of a law enforcement officer recruit whose preparatory training costs were 24paid under subd. 1.AB360,4,91(c) If the department receives a grant application from a small law 2enforcement agency on the list in par. (a) and money is available under the 3program, the department shall, within one week of receiving the application, 4distribute sufficient moneys to pay for training under par. (c) 1. or 2. occurring 5while the application is being reviewed by the department. The department shall 6seek reimbursement of such moneys from the agency if the department 7subsequently denies the application. If the department approves the application, 8the department shall distribute the training grant as soon as practicable to the 9agency.AB360,4,1410(d) If a small law enforcement agency received reimbursement for training a 11preservice law enforcement officer student or law enforcement officer recruit from 12the law enforcement standards board under s. 165.85 (5) (b), the amount of a grant 13received under this section may not exceed the difference between the amount 14reimbursed and the actual costs incurred by the agency.AB360,4,2115(e) A preservice law enforcement officer student or law enforcement officer 16recruit whose training costs are paid for with a grant under the program shall 17commit to working at the small law enforcement agency that received the grant for 18one year after the training has ended. If the individual does not fulfill the 19commitment due to any reason besides termination other than for cause, the 20department may seek repayment from the individual of the training costs paid for 21by the grant on a prorated basis.AB360,5,222(f) A small law enforcement agency that receives a grant under the program 23may exclude a law enforcement officer recruit whose training costs were paid by the 1grant in any required maintenance of effort for law enforcement officer staffing for 26 months after the recruit completes training.AB360,5,63(g) The program terminates 18 months after all moneys available under the 4program have been disbursed, as determined by the secretary. After that date, the 5department shall continue to make reasonable efforts to seek repayment under par. 6(e).AB360,5,77